Maine, session 132, LD106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-M, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. State tax. An individual filing a new claim for family leave benefits or medical
leave benefits under this subchapter may elect to have the administrator deduct and
withhold state income tax from the individual’s payment of benefits at the rate of 5%. The
department shall advise an individual filing a new claim, at the time the individual files the
claim, that:
A. The benefits are subject to state income tax;
B. Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
C. The individual may elect to have state income tax deducted and withheld from the
individual's payment of benefits at the rate of 5%; and
D. The individual is permitted to change a previously elected withholding status.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§1, ¶QQ is enacted to read:
QQ. For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an amount equal to
the amount of family leave benefits or medical leave benefits paid pursuant to Title 26,
section 850-C, to the extent those benefits are not included in the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, an amount equal
to the amount of any family leave benefits or medical leave benefits that were repaid
by the taxpayer pursuant to Title 26, section 850-L, subsection 2 that have been
previously taxed under this Part.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §5255-D is enacted to read:
§5255-D. Withholding on paid family and medical leave benefits
When an individual receiving family leave benefits or medical leave benefits under the
paid family and medical leave benefits program established in Title 26, section 850-B
makes an election pursuant to Title 26, section 850-M, subsection 1-A, the administrator
of the paid family and medical leave benefits program shall deduct and withhold state
income tax at the rate of 5% from the family leave benefits or medical leave benefits paid
to the individual pursuant to Title 26, sections 850-B and 850-C.